es: Uso: Pista circular; Rendimiento diésel; Carreras de aceleración; Ahorro de combustible; Rendimiento moderado en la calle; Repuesto OEM; Todoterreno; Carreras de ruta; Calle/pista; Remolque; Pista/carrera; Otro
el: Χρήση: Κυκλική πίστα; Απόδοση diesel; Αγώνες drag; Οικονομία καυσίμου; Ήπια απόδοση δρόμου; Αντικατάσταση OEM; Εκτός δρόμου; Αγώνες δρόμου; Δρόμου/πίστας; Ρυμούλκηση; Πίστας/αγώνων; Άλλο
th: การใช้งาน: เซอร์กิตแทร็ก; สมรรถนะเครื่องยนต์ดีเซล; แข่งแดร็ก; ประหยัดน้ำมัน; สมรรถนะขับขี่ทั่วไปบนถนน; อะไหล่ทดแทน OEM; ออฟโรด; การแข่งรถบนถนน; ถนนทั่วไป/สนามแข่ง; การลากจูง; สนาม/การแข่งขัน; อื่นๆ
cs: Použití: Závodní okruh; Výkon dieselu; Závody dragsterů; Úspora paliva; Mírný tuning na ulici; OEM náhrada; Off-road; Silniční závody; Běžný provoz / sprinty; Tažení; Okruh/závod; Jiné
sk-SK: Použitie: Kruhová dráha; Výkonnosť naftových motorov; Preteky dragsterov; Úspora paliva; Mierna cestná výkonnosť; OEM náhrada; Off-road; Cestné preteky; Cesta/trať; Ťahanie; Trať/preteky; Iné
it: Utilizzo: Pista circolare; Prestazioni diesel; Drag racing; Risparmio di carburante; Prestazioni stradali moderate; Ricambio OEM; Fuoristrada; Corse su strada; Strada/Pista; Traino; Pista/Gara; Altro
ro-RO: Utilizare: Pistă circulară; Performanțe diesel; Curse de accelerare; Economie de combustibil; Performanțe stradale moderate; Înlocuire OEM; Off-road; Curse pe șosea; Stradă/pistă; Tractare; Pistă/cursă; Altele
bg-BG: Предназначение: Кръгова писта; Дизелова ефективност; Драг състезания; Икономия на гориво; Умерена улична ефективност; OEM заместител; Офроуд; Шосейни състезания; Улица/писта; Теглене; Писта/състезание; Друго
sl-SI: Uporaba: Krožna steza; Zmogljivost dizelskih motorjev; Dirkanje v pospeševanju; Varčna poraba goriva; Zmerna cestna zmogljivost; OEM zamenjava; Terenska vožnja; Cestno dirkanje; Cesta/dirkališče; Vleka; Steza/dirka; Drugo
ko: 용도: 원형 트랙; 디젤 성능; 드래그 레이싱; 연비; 마일드 스트리트 성능; OEM 교체; 오프로드; 도로 경주; 스트리트/스트립; 견인; 트랙/레이스; 기타
nl: Gebruik: Circle track; Dieselprestaties; Dragracing; Brandstofbesparing; Lichte straatprestaties; OEM-vervanging; Offroad; Wegracen; Straat/circuit; Slepen; Circuit/race; Overig
nb: Bruk: Rundbane; Dieselytelse; Dragracing; Drivstofføkonomi; Lett gateytelse; OEM-erstatning; Offroad; Roadracing; Gate/stripe; Sleping; Bane/løp; Annet
pl: Zastosowanie: Tor owalny; Wydajność silników wysokoprężnych; Wyścigi równoległe; Ekonomia paliwowa; Lekki tuning uliczny; Część zamienna OEM; Jazda terenowa; Wyścigi drogowe; Ulica/tor; Holowanie; Tor/wyścig; Inne
pt-BR: Uso: Pista oval; Desempenho diesel; Arrancada; Economia de combustível; Desempenho leve para rua; Reposição OEM; Off-road; Circuito misto; Rua/arrancada; Reboque; Pista/corrida; Outro
sv: Användande: Rundbana; Dieselprestanda; Dragracing; Bränsleekonomi; Mild gatuprestanda; OEM-ersättning; Terräng; Roadracing; Gata/strip; Bogsering; Bana/tävling; Övrigt
vi: Cách sử dụng: Đường đua vòng tròn; Hiệu suất động cơ diesel; Đua xe drag; Tiết kiệm nhiên liệu; Hiệu suất đường phố cơ bản; Thay thế OEM; Địa hình (Off-road); Đua xe đường trường; Đường phố/Đường đua drag; Kéo xe; Đường đua/Đua xe; Khác
hu: Felhasználási terület: Körpálya; Dízelteljesítmény; Gyorsulási verseny; Üzemanyag-takarékosság; Enyhe utcai teljesítmény; Gyári (OEM) cserealkatrész; Off-road; Országúti verseny; Utcai/Pálya; Vontatás; Pálya/Verseny; Egyéb
fi: Käyttö: Ovaalirata; Dieselin suorituskyky; Kiihdytysajo; Polttoainetaloudellisuus; Kevyt katusuorituskyky; OEM-varaosa; Maasto; Rata-ajo; Katu/rata; Hinaus; Rata/kilpailu; Muu
ru: Назначение: Круговая трасса; Дизельный тюнинг; Дрэг-рейсинг; Экономия топлива; Легкий городской тюнинг; Замена OEM-деталей; Бездорожье; Шоссейные гонки; Улица/дрэг-стрип; Буксировка; Трасса/гонки; Другое
fr: Usage: Piste circulaire; Performance diesel; Course d’accélération; Économie de carburant; Performance légère sur route; Remplacement d’origine (OEM); Hors route; Course sur route; Route/piste; Remorquage; Piste/course; Autre
de: Verwendungszweck: Rundstrecke; Diesel-Performance; Drag-Racing; Kraftstoffeffizienz; Leichte Straßen-Performance; OEM-Ersatzteil; Offroad; Straßenrennen; Straße/Strip; Anhängerbetrieb; Rennstrecke/Rennen; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 用途: 环形赛道; 柴油性能; 直线竞速赛; 燃油经济性; 轻度街道性能; OEM 替换件; 越野; 公路赛车; 街道/赛道; 拖拽; 赛道/比赛; 其他
hr-HR: Uporaba: Kružna staza; Učinkovitost dizelskog motora; Utrke ubrzanja; Ušteda goriva; Umjerena ulična učinkovitost; OEM zamjena; Terenska vožnja; Cestovne utrke; Cesta/pista; Vuča; Staza/utrka; Ostalo
ja: 用途: オーバルトラック; ディーゼルパフォーマンス; ドラッグレース; 燃費向上; マイルドストリートパフォーマンス; OEM 交換; オフロード; ロードレース; ストリート/ストリップ; 牽引; トラック/レース; その他
pt-PT: Utilização: Pista circular; Desempenho a diesel; Corridas de aceleração; Economia de combustível; Desempenho moderado em estrada; Substituição OEM; Todo-o-terreno; Corridas de estrada; Estrada/pista; Reboque; Pista/corrida; Outro
tr: Kullanım amacı: Dairesel pist (Circle track); Dizel performansı; Drag yarışı; Yakıt tasarrufu; Hafif sokak performansı; OEM değişimi; Off-road; Yol yarışı; Sokak/pist (Street/strip); Çekme; Pist/yarış; Diğer
lt-LT: Naudojimas: Žiedinė trasa; Dyzelinių variklių našumas; Traukos lenktynės; Degalų taupymas; Vidutinis gatvės našumas; OEM pakaitalas; Bekelė; Plento lenktynės; Gatvė / traukos trasa; Vilkimas; Trasa / lenktynės; Kita
da: Brug: Rundbane; Dieselydeevne; Dragracing; Brændstoføkonomi; Let gadeydeevne; OEM-udskiftning; Offroad; Roadracing; Gade/racerbane; Bugsering; Bane/løb; Andet
en: Usage: Circle track; Diesel performance; Drag racing; Fuel economy; Mild street performance; OEM replacement; Off-road; Road racing; Street/strip; Towing; Track/race; Other
zh-TW: 用途: 繞圈賽道; 柴油性能; 直線競速賽; 燃油經濟性; 輕度街道性能; 原廠替換; 越野; 公路賽; 街道/直線競速; 拖曳; 賽道/競速; 其他